New York, session 2025-2026, S1474.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Instruction in agriculture. Beginning in the two thousand twen- 4 ty-six--two thousand twenty-seven school year, and in each school year 5 thereafter, the officer, board or commission authorized or required to 6 prescribe courses of instruction shall cause instruction to be given in 7 every elementary, middle, and high school under state control or 8 supported wholly or partly by public money of the state, in the disci- 9 plines necessary to be a successful farmer for the purposes of ensuring 10 children understand the origin, by-products, and farm-to-market proc- 11 esses of their food, nutrients, and clothes. Such instruction shall 12 include topic matters such as resource conservation and management 13 including food, water, forest, and land, city agriculture management, 14 food-to-table processes, sustainability practices, waste management, 15 textile production, career choices in the agriculture industry, the 16 daily life of a farmer, and culture in rural farming communities. Such 17 instruction shall be for such period of time during each school year as 18 the board of regents may prescribe and may be joined with work in the 19 sciences, mathematics, history, and/or business. Such courses of 20 instruction shall be approved by both the department of education and 21 the department of agriculture and markets. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04522-01-5